Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.086

Negligence of owner of infected livestock—Liability.

When any livestock affected with any contagious, infectious, or communicable disease mingle with any healthy livestock belonging to another person, through the fault or negligence of the owner of the diseased livestock or his or her agent, the owner is liable for all damages sustained by the owner of the healthy livestock.

[ 1998 c 8 s 16; 1927 c 165 s 32; RRS s 3141. Prior: See Reviser's note to RCW 16.44.020. Formerly RCW 16.44.160.]